Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 36 SALES TAX
§ 63-3627. Responsibility for taxes.

Every person with the duty to account for and pay over any tax which is imposed upon or required to be collected by any taxpayer under this chapter on behalf of such taxpayer as an officer, member or employee of such taxpayer, shall be personally liable for payment of such tax, plus penalties and interest, if he fails to carry out his duty.

Any such individual required to collect, truthfully account for, and pay over any tax imposed by this chapter who willfully fails to collect such tax, or truthfully account for and pay over such tax, or willfully attempts in any manner to evade or defeat any such tax or the payment thereof, shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be liable to a penalty equal to the total amount of the tax evaded, or not collected, or not accounted for and paid over. No penalty shall be imposed under section 63-3046(b), Idaho Code, for any offense to which this subsection (b) is applicable.

§ 63-3628. Successors’ liability.

If any vendor liable for any amount under this act sells out his business or stock of goods, the vendee shall make inquiry of the state tax commission and withhold from the purchase price any amount of tax that may be due under this act until such time as the vendor produces a receipt stating that no amount is due.

If the purchaser of a business or stock of goods fails to withhold from the purchase price as above required, he becomes personally liable for the payment of the amount required to be withheld by him to the extent of the purchase price valued in money.

The state tax commission shall, as soon as practicable after receiving written inquiry as to the amount due and no later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the inquiry or, if necessary, thirty (30) days from the date the vendor’s records are made available for audit, but in any event no later than sixty (60) days after receiving the inquiry, issue a statement to the purchaser setting forth the amount of tax due by the vendor, if any. Failure of the state tax commission to issue such statement will release the purchaser from any obligation to withhold from the purchase price as above required.

§ 63-3629. Deficiency determinations.

If the state tax commission is not satisfied with the return or returns of the tax, because of errors or omissions discovered in audits or in any other way, it may compute and determine the amount which is due upon the basis of facts contained in the return or returns or upon the basis of any information within its possession or that may come into its possession and assert a deficiency. One or more deficiency determinations may be made of the amount due for one or for more than one period. In making such determination, the state tax commission may offset overpayments against amounts due.

If any person fails to make a return, the state tax commission shall make an estimate of the amount of sales or use subject to tax by this act, and shall in this manner determine the amount of tax due from such person. The estimate shall be made for the period or periods in respect to which the person failed to make a return and shall be based upon any information which is in the state tax commission’s possession or may come into its possession.

The state tax commission shall give written notice of its determination and the amount of the deficiency, including any interest and penalties, to the person from whom such deficiency amount is due in the manner prescribed by section 63-3045, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3630. Jeopardy determinations.

If the state tax commission finds that a taxpayer is about to depart from the state of Idaho or to remove his property therefrom, or to conceal himself or his property therein, or to do any other act tending to prejudice or to render wholly or partially ineffectual proceedings to collect the tax for the taxable period or any taxes unless such proceedings be brought without delay, the state tax commission shall thereupon make a determination of the tax or amount of tax, together with interest or penalty, required to be collected, noting that fact upon the determination. Upon giving notice and demand, the amount determined shall be immediately due and payable. In any proceeding in court brought to enforce payment of taxes made due and payable by virture [virtue] of the provisions of this section, the finding of the state tax commission, made as herein provided, whether made after notice to the taxpayer or not, shall be for all purposes prima facie evidence of the taxpayers [taxpayer’s] design.

Collection procedures may be instituted immediately. Any taxpayer deeming himself aggrieved may, within thirty (30) days of receipt of notice, petition to the state tax commission for a redetermination upon payment of the tax together with interest and penalty demanded by the assessment to the state tax commission.

§ 63-3631. Redetermination.

Any person against whom a deficiency determination is made under section 63-3629, Idaho Code, or in regard to whom the state tax commission proposes to revoke or suspend a permit under section 63-3620, 63-3620A or 63-3623B, Idaho Code, or any person directly interested, may petition for a redetermination within the time period allowed by section 63-3045, Idaho Code. If a petition for redetermination is not filed within the time period allowed, the determination becomes final as provided in section 63-3045B, Idaho Code.

The state tax commission may decrease or increase the amount of the determination before it becomes final, but the amount may be increased only if a claim for the increase is asserted by the state tax commission at or before the hearing.

A person petitioning for a redetermination under subsection (1) of this section may, in support of his petition, submit resale certificates as provided in section 63-3620 or section 63-3621, Idaho Code, or an exemption certificate as provided in section 63-3622, Idaho Code, only if such certificates are presented to the tax commission within ninety (90) days of the date of the notice of deficiency determination to which the petition relates.

§ 63-3632. Interest on deficiencies.

Interest upon any deficiency shall be assessed at the same time as the deficiency and shall be due and payable upon notice and demand from the state tax commission and shall be collected as a part of the tax at the rate provided in section 63-3045, Idaho Code, from the date prescribed for the payment of the tax.

§ 63-3633. Period of limitation upon assessment and collection.

Except as otherwise provided in this section:

The amount of taxes imposed by this chapter shall be assessed within three (3) years after the due date of the return or the date the return was filed, whichever is the later, and no proceeding in court without assessment for the collection of such taxes shall be begun after the expiration of such period; provided, however, if an assessment has been made within the prescribed time, such tax may be collected by levy or by a proceeding in court within a period of six (6) years after assessment of the tax and, provided further, that this shall not be in derogation of any of the remedies elsewhere herein provided. The running of the period of limitations provided by this section shall be suspended for the period during which the state tax commission is prohibited from making the assessment or from collecting by levy or a proceeding in court, and for thirty (30) days thereafter.

In the case of a false or fraudulent return with the intent to evade tax, or a willful attempt in any manner to defeat or evade tax, the tax may be assessed, or a proceeding in court for collection of such tax may be begun without assessment, at any time.

In the case of taxes owed by a person who has failed to file a return as provided in section 63-3623, Idaho Code, the amount of taxes imposed in this chapter shall be assessed within seven (7) years of the time the return upon which the tax asserted to be due should have been filed.

The periods of limitation upon assessment and collection provided in this section shall not apply:

In cases where the facts disclose a false or fraudulent act with the intent to evade tax, or

To taxes collected by a retailer, seller or any other person who has failed to pay over such taxes to the state tax commission.

In the case of taxes due during the lifetime of a decedent, or by his estate during the period of administration, a notice of deficiency shall be issued, a claim shall be made, the tax shall be assessed, or any proceeding in court without assessment for the collection of such tax shall be begun, within twelve (12) months after written request for prompt action is filed with the state tax commission by the executor, administrator, or other fiduciary representing the estate of such decedent. This subsection shall not apply if the return for which the request for prompt action relates has not been filed with the state tax commission.

No assessment of a deficiency with respect to the tax imposed by this chapter, and no distraint or proceedings in court for its collection shall be made, begun, or prosecuted until a notice under section 63-3629, Idaho Code, has been mailed to the taxpayer, nor until all appeal rights relating to the deficiency have become final.

Where, before the expiration of the time prescribed in this section for the assessment of any tax imposed by this act, both the state tax commission or its delegate or deputy and the taxpayer have consented in writing to its assessment after such time, the tax may be assessed at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

§ 63-3634. Additions and penalties.

The additions, penalties and requirements provided by the Idaho Income Tax Act, sections 63-3046, 63-3075, 63-3076 and 63-3077, Idaho Code, shall apply in the same manner and to the same extent to this act as to the Idaho Income Tax Act and shall cover acts, omissions, and delinquencies under this act similar to acts, omissions and delinquencies under the Idaho Income Tax Act and such additions, penalties and requirements shall, for this purpose, be described as and be for acts, omissions, delinquencies and requirements under the Idaho Sales Tax Act; provided, however, that the provisions of section 63-3076, Idaho Code, shall not prevent the release of information about a specific transaction to any party to such transaction and any individual signing an exemption claim relating to the transaction. The tax commission may release such information only when it determines that the release will benefit the enforcement of this chapter, and not otherwise.

§ 63-3634A. Authority to enter agreements.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 63-3634 or 63-3076, Idaho Code, relating to confidentiality, the state tax commission may enter into a written agreement with the Idaho transportation department providing for exchange of information as both the commission and the department may find necessary to implement the letter and intent of this chapter or the laws relating to the registration of motor vehicles in this state. The state tax commission is not authorized by this section to disclose any financial information from any tax return filed with the tax commission other than whether or not an individual filed a resident or nonresident return.

§ 63-3635. Collection and enforcement.

The collection and enforcement procedures provided by the Idaho Income Tax Act, sections 63-3030A, 63-3038, 63-3039, 63-3040, 63-3042, 63-3043, 63-3044, 63-3045B, 63-3047, 63-3048, 63-3049, 63-3050 through 63-3064, 63-3065A, 63-3071 and 63-3074, Idaho Code, shall apply and be available to the state tax commission for enforcement of the provisions of this act and collection of any amounts due under this act, and said sections shall, for this purpose, be considered part of this act and wherever liens or any other proceedings are defined as income tax liens or proceedings, they shall, when applied in enforcement or collection under this act, be described as sales and use tax liens and proceedings.

§ 63-3636. Criminal penalties. [Repealed.]

§ 63-3637. Sales tax distribution — Definitions.

For the purposes of section 63-3638, Idaho Code, the following definitions shall apply:

“Per capita distribution” means the amount to be distributed to cities and counties on the basis of their most current population or population estimates available from the United States census bureau no later than thirty (30) days prior to the next quarterly distribution from the revenue-sharing account.

“Revenue-sharing account” means the account established in the treasury for all sales and use tax revenue to be distributed on a quarterly basis pursuant to section 63-3638(10), Idaho Code.

§ 63-3638. Sales tax — Distribution.

All moneys collected under this chapter, except as may otherwise be required in sections 63-3203, 63-3620F, and 63-3709, Idaho Code, and except as provided in subsection (16) of this section, shall be distributed by the state tax commission as follows:

An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account sufficient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized under this chapter by the state tax commission shall be paid through the state refund account, and those moneys are continuously appropriated.

Five million dollars ($5,000,000) per year is continuously appropriated and shall be distributed to the permanent building fund, provided by section 57-1108, Idaho Code.

Four million eight hundred thousand dollars ($4,800,000) per year is continuously appropriated and shall be distributed to the water pollution control fund established by section 39-3628, Idaho Code.

An amount equal to the sum required to be certified by the chairman of the Idaho housing and finance association to the state tax commission pursuant to section 67-6211, Idaho Code, in each year is continuously appropriated and shall be paid to any capital reserve fund established by the Idaho housing and finance association pursuant to section 67-6211, Idaho Code. Such amounts, if any, as may be appropriated hereunder to the capital reserve fund of the Idaho housing and finance association shall be repaid for distribution under the provisions of this section, subject to the provisions of section 67-6215, Idaho Code, by the Idaho housing and finance association, as soon as possible, from any moneys available therefor and in excess of the amounts the association determines will keep it self-supporting.

An amount equal to the sum required by the provisions of sections 63-709 and 63-717, Idaho Code, after allowance for the amount appropriated by section 63-718(3), Idaho Code, is continuously appropriated and shall be paid as provided by sections 63-709 and 63-717, Idaho Code.

An amount required by the provisions of chapter 53, title 33, Idaho Code.

An amount required by the provisions of chapter 87, title 67, Idaho Code.

For fiscal year 2011 and each fiscal year thereafter, four million one hundred thousand dollars ($4,100,000), of which two million two hundred thousand dollars ($2,200,000) shall be distributed to each of the forty-four (44) counties in equal amounts and one million nine hundred thousand dollars ($1,900,000) shall be distributed to the forty-four (44) counties in the proportion that the population of the county bears to the population of the state. For fiscal year 2012 and for each fiscal year thereafter, the amount distributed pursuant to this subsection shall be adjusted annually by the state tax commission in accordance with the consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U) as published by the U.S. department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, but in no fiscal year shall the total amount allocated for counties under this subsection be less than four million one hundred thousand dollars ($4,100,000). Any increase resulting from the adjustment required in this section shall be distributed to each county in the proportion that the population of the county bears to the population of the state. Each county shall establish a special election fund to which shall be deposited all revenues received from the distribution pursuant to this subsection. All such revenues shall be used exclusively to defray the costs associated with conducting elections as required of county clerks by the provisions of section 34-1401, Idaho Code.

One dollar ($1.00) on each application for certificate of title or initial application for registration of a motor vehicle, snowmobile, all-terrain vehicle or other vehicle processed by the county assessor or the Idaho transportation department, excepting those applications in which any sales or use taxes due have been previously collected by a retailer, shall be a fee for the services of the assessor of the county or the Idaho transportation department in collecting such taxes and shall be paid into the current expense fund of the county or state highway account established in section 40-702, Idaho Code.

Eleven and five-tenths percent (11.5%) is continuously appropriated and shall be distributed to the revenue-sharing account, which is hereby created in the state treasury, and the moneys in the revenue-sharing account will be paid in installments each calendar quarter by the state tax commission on and after July 1, 2020, as follows:

Forty-five and two-tenths percent (45.2%) shall be paid to the various cities as follows:

The revenue-sharing amount calculated by the state tax commission for the various cities for each quarter of fiscal year 2020 shall be the base amount for current quarterly revenue distribution amounts. The state tax commission shall calculate the per capita distribution for each city resulting from the previous fiscal year’s distributions.

If there is no change in the amount of the revenue-sharing account from the same quarter of the previous fiscal year, then the various cities shall receive the same amount received for the same quarter of the previous fiscal year.

If the balance of the revenue-sharing account for the current quarter is greater than the balance of the revenue-sharing account for the same quarter of the previous fiscal year, then:

If the distributions made to the cities during the same quarter of the previous fiscal year were below the base amount established in fiscal year 2020, then the various cities shall first receive a proportional increase up to the base amount for each city and up to a one percent (1%) increase over such base amount. Any remaining moneys shall be distributed to cities with a below-average per capita distribution in the proportion that the population of that city bears to the population of all cities with below-average per capita distributions within the state.

If the distributions made to the cities during the same quarter of the previous fiscal year were at or above the base amount established in fiscal year 2020, then the cities shall receive the same distribution they received during the same quarter of the previous fiscal year plus a proportional increase up to one percent (1%). Any remaining moneys shall be distributed to the cities with a below-average per capita distribution in the proportion that the population of that city bears to the population of all cities with a below-average per capita distribution within the state.

If the balance of the revenue-sharing account for the current quarter is less than the balance of the revenue-sharing account for the same quarter of the previous fiscal year, then the cities shall first receive a proportional reduction down to the base amount established in fiscal year 2020. If further reductions are necessary, the cities shall receive reductions based on the proportion that each city’s population bears to the population of all cities within the state.

Forty-seven and one-tenth percent (47.1%) shall be paid to the various counties as follows:

Fifty-nine and eight-tenths percent (59.8%) of the amount to be distributed under this paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be distributed as follows:

One million three hundred twenty thousand dollars ($1,320,000) annually shall be distributed one forty-fourth (1/44) to each of the various counties; and
2. The balance of such amount shall be paid to the various counties, and each county shall be entitled to an amount in the proportion that the population of that county bears to the population of the state; and

If the dollar amount of money available under this subsection (10)(b)(ii) in any quarter does not equal the amount paid in the fourth quarter of calendar year 1999, each county’s payment shall be reduced proportionately.

If the dollar amount of money available under this subsection (10)(b)(ii) in any quarter exceeds the amount paid in the fourth quarter of calendar year 1999, each county shall be entitled to a proportionately increased payment, but such increase shall not exceed one hundred five percent (105%) of the total payment made in the fourth quarter of calendar year 1999.

If the dollar amount of money available under this subsection (10)(b)(ii) in any quarter exceeds one hundred five percent (105%) of the total payment made in the fourth quarter of calendar year 1999, any amount over and above such one hundred five percent (105%) shall be paid to the various counties in the proportion that the population of the county bears to the population of the state; and

Forty and two-tenths percent (40.2%) of the amount to be distributed under this paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be distributed as follows:

Seven and seven-tenths percent (7.7%) of the amount appropriated in this subsection shall be paid to the several counties for distribution to special purpose taxing districts as follows:

Each such district that received a payment under the provisions of section 63-3638(e), Idaho Code, as such subsection existed immediately prior to July 1, 2000, during the fourth quarter of calendar year 1999, shall be entitled to a like amount during succeeding calendar quarters.

If the dollar amount of money available under this subsection (10)(c) in any quarter does not equal the amount paid in the fourth quarter of calendar year 1999, each special purpose taxing district’s payment shall be reduced proportionately.

If the dollar amount of money available under this subsection (10)(c) in any quarter exceeds the amount distributed under paragraph (c)(i) of this subsection, each special purpose taxing district shall be entitled to a share of the excess based on the proportion each such district’s current property tax budget bears to the sum of the current property tax budgets of all such districts in the state. The state tax commission shall calculate district current property tax budgets to include any unrecovered forgone amounts as determined under section 63-802(1)(e), Idaho Code. When a special purpose taxing district is situated in more than one (1) county, the state tax commission shall determine the portion attributable to the special purpose taxing district from each county in which it is situated.

If special purpose taxing districts are consolidated, the resulting district is entitled to a base amount equal to the sum of the base amounts received in the last calendar quarter by each district prior to the consolidation.

If a special purpose taxing district is dissolved or disincorporated, the state tax commission shall continuously distribute to the board of county commissioners an amount equal to the last quarter’s distribution prior to dissolution or disincorporation. The board of county commissioners shall determine any redistribution of moneys so received.

Taxing districts formed after January 1, 2001, are not entitled to a payment under the provisions of this paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(vii) For purposes of this paragraph (c) of this subsection, a special purpose taxing district is any taxing district that is not a city, a county, or a school district.

Amounts calculated in accordance with section 2, chapter 356, laws of 2001, for annual distribution to counties and other taxing districts beginning in October 2001 for replacement of property tax on farm machinery and equipment exempted pursuant to section 63-602EE, Idaho Code. For nonschool districts, the state tax commission shall distribute one-fourth (1/4) of this amount certified quarterly to each county. For school districts, the state tax commission shall distribute one-fourth (1/4) of the amount certified quarterly to each school district. For nonschool districts, the county auditor shall distribute to each district within thirty (30) calendar days from receipt of moneys from the state tax commission. Moneys received by each taxing district for replacement shall be utilized in the same manner and in the same proportions as revenues from property taxation. The moneys remitted to the county treasurer for replacement of property exempt from taxation pursuant to section 63-602EE, Idaho Code, may be considered by the counties and other taxing districts and budgeted at the same time, in the same manner and in the same year as revenues from taxation on personal property which these moneys replace. If taxing districts are consolidated, the resulting district is entitled to an amount equal to the sum of the amounts received in the last calendar quarter by each district pursuant to this subsection prior to the consolidation. If a taxing district is dissolved or disincorporated, the state tax commission shall continuously distribute to the board of county commissioners an amount equal to the last quarter’s distribution prior to dissolution or disincorporation. The board of county commissioners shall determine any redistribution of moneys so received. If a taxing district annexes territory, the distribution of moneys received pursuant to this subsection shall be unaffected. Taxing districts formed after January 1, 2001, are not entitled to a payment under the provisions of this subsection. School districts shall receive an amount determined by multiplying the sum of the year 2000 school district levy minus. 004 times the market value on December 31, 2000, in the district of the property exempt from taxation pursuant to section 63-602EE, Idaho Code, provided that the result of these calculations shall not be less than zero (0). The result of these school district calculations shall be further increased by six percent (6%). For purposes of the limitation provided by section 63-802, Idaho Code, moneys received pursuant to this section as property tax replacement for property exempt from taxation pursuant to section 63-602EE, Idaho Code, shall be treated as property tax revenues.

Amounts necessary to pay refunds as provided in section 63-3641, Idaho Code, to a developer of a retail complex shall be remitted to the demonstration pilot project fund created in section 63-3641, Idaho Code.

Amounts calculated in accordance with subsection (4) of section 63-602KK, Idaho Code, for annual distribution to counties and other taxing districts for replacement of property tax on personal property tax exemptions pursuant to subsection (2) of section 63-602KK, Idaho Code, which amounts are continuously appropriated unless the legislature enacts a different appropriation for a particular fiscal year. For purposes of the limitation provided by section 63-802, Idaho Code, moneys received pursuant to this section as property tax replacement for property exempt from taxation pursuant to section 63-602KK, Idaho Code, shall be treated as property tax revenues. If taxing districts are consolidated, the resulting district is entitled to an amount equal to the sum of the amounts that were received in the last calendar year by each district pursuant to this subsection prior to the consolidation. If a taxing district or revenue allocation area annexes territory, the distribution of moneys received pursuant to this subsection shall be unaffected. Taxing districts and revenue allocation areas formed after January 1, 2013, are not entitled to a payment under the provisions of this subsection.
(14) Amounts collected from purchasers and paid to the state of Idaho by retailers that are not engaged in business in this state and which retailer would not have been required to collect the sales tax, less amounts otherwise distributed in subsections (1) and (10) of this section, shall be distributed to the tax relief fund created in section 57-811, Idaho Code. The state tax commission will determine the amounts to be distributed under this subsection.

1. Each county that received a payment under the provisions of section 63-3638(e), Idaho Code, as that subsection existed immediately prior to July 1, 2000, during the fourth quarter of calendar year 1999, shall be entitled to a like amount during succeeding calendar quarters.

(15) Any moneys remaining over and above those necessary to meet and reserve for payments under other subsections of this section shall be distributed to the general fund.

(16) One percent (1%), but not less than fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), is continuously appropriated and shall be distributed to the transportation expansion and congestion mitigation fund established in section 40-720, Idaho Code. The distribution provided for in this subsection must immediately follow the distribution provided for in subsection (10) of this section.

Formula for Distribution.

The formula for distribution on a graduated basis of a portion of the sales tax fund to the counties and other taxing units therein is merely an attempt to reimburse those taxing units for the loss of revenue resulting from the exemption in the process of business inventory ad valorem taxation phaseout; the formula is neither arbitrary nor unreasonable in view of the purposes of the formula. Leonardson v. Moon, 92 Idaho 796, 451 P.2d 542 (1969).

§ 63-3638A. Sales tax on liquor to be paid to liquor account.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 63-3638, Idaho Code, the sales tax collected on the retail sale of liquor and all other merchandise by or on behalf of the director of the state liquor division shall be credited directly to the liquor account, and shall not be or become a part of the sales tax account.

§ 63-3639. [Reserved.]

Commencing October 1, 2006, the purchase, use, storage or other consumption of tangible personal property which is otherwise subject to the taxes imposed by this chapter by persons defined in section 63-3609(a), Idaho Code, shall be exempt from one cent (1¢) of the taxes imposed by sections 63-3619 and 63-3621, Idaho Code, if:

The tangible personal property is purchased, used, stored or otherwise consumed for incorporation into real property; and

The tangible personal property is purchased, used, stored or otherwise consumed in regard to a project performed by such person pursuant to a qualified contract; and

The taxpayer claims the exemption in the manner provided by subsection (3) of this section.

As used in this section, the term “qualified contract” means a contract which:

Is a written contract; and

Was in effect on September 1, 2006, or was submitted for bid or bid in written form on or before September 1, 2006, and subsequently became a written contract; and

Was negotiated or bid based upon the sales or use tax being five percent (5%); and

Requires the cost of the sales or use tax to be borne by the contractor.

A person entitled to the exemption granted in subsection (1) of this section may submit a claim for refund to the state tax commission for the amount of one cent (1¢) of the tax imposed by sections 63-3619 and 63-3621, Idaho Code, if it has actually been paid by him. The claim for refund shall include:

A copy of a written contract which is a qualified contract; and

A detailed invoice prepared by the seller showing all items of tangible personal property purchased by the claimant, the sale of which is subject to the exemption granted in subsection (1) of this section; and

A document signed by the purchaser certifying that the tangible personal property shown on the invoice required by subsection (3)(b) of this section has in fact been used by him on the project to which the qualified contract relates.

Upon receipt of the claim for refund, the state tax commission shall review the claim and, if it finds it to be proper, shall pay the refund together with interest from the date that the claim was filed at the rate established by section 63-3045, Idaho Code, within thirty (30) days from the date the claim was received by the commission.

The use or incorporation into real property of any tangible personal property upon which the exemption provided by subsection (1) of this section has been claimed pursuant to any contract other than a qualified contract shall be a misdemeanor.

In addition to the criminal penalties provided by subsection (5) of this section, the use or incorporation into real property of tangible personal property upon which the exemption provided by subsection (1) of this section has been claimed pursuant to any contract which is not a qualified contract shall subject the user to a penalty of three (3) times the sales or use tax otherwise due under this chapter to be enforced and collected as provided by sections 63-3634 and 63-3635, Idaho Code.
(7) In the case of a retailer who makes sales of tangible personal property to any person entitled to the exemption granted in subsection (1) of this section who is for any reason unable to collect one cent (1¢) of the tax imposed by sections 63-3619 and 63-3621, Idaho Code, from the purchaser, the retailer shall be entitled to claim the refund otherwise available to the purchaser. The claim for refund shall be filed in the manner prescribed by subsection (3) of this section. Nothing in this subsection shall excuse the retailer from reporting sales and use taxes at the full statutory rate on all taxable sales made during the period to which his sales or use tax return relates. If a refund claim is filed concurrently with the return, the refund claimed may be credited against the tax due on the return. Any retailer who claims a refund for any taxes actually collected from the purchaser shall be subject to a penalty of three (3) times the sales or use tax refund improperly claimed to be enforced and collected as provided by sections 63-3634 and 63-3635, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3640A. Contracts entered into before effective date of increased tax. [Repealed.]